Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB841.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2402-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 2402-A. Annual Property Survey.--(a) The department shall distribute to all agencies, not later than January 1 of each year, a request to compile information on all State-owned real property[.], to which the following shall apply:(1) The survey shall require the agency, for each parcel of real property, within its jurisdiction, to identify its location, size, current use, the presence of any buildings or other improvements, the condition of all buildings and improvements and other relevant property attribute data.(2) The survey shall require the agency to identify any property currently surplus to the needs of the agency.(3) The survey shall require the agency, for each surplus property identified under paragraph (2), in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, to assess the surplus property's affordable housing development potential for very low-income households, low-income households or middle-income households.(b) (1) Agencies shall send to the department, not later than March 1 of each year, completed annual property surveys.(2) The department shall compile and consolidate the agency surveys and send a copy of the compilation to the Chairmen and Minority Chairmen of the House and Senate State Government Committees or their successor committees.(3) In compiling and consolidating the agency surveys, the department shall include categories for surplus properties suitable for affordable housing development and surplus properties not suitable for affordable housing development.(c) For all real property identified as surplus by an agency, the department shall determine whether any other agencies have an appropriate use for the property. If it is 20250HB0841PN0871 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 desirable and appropriate to transfer to another agency property that has been deemed surplus by the administering agency currently using the property, the department shall prepare a plan for transfer of the property. Upon approval of the transfer plan by the General Counsel and the Secretary of Budget and Administration, use of the property shall be transferred to the agency that can make the best use of the property.(d) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affordable housing." Housing in which the occupant is paying no more than 30% of gross income for housing costs, including utilities."Low-income household." A single individual, family or unrelated individuals living together whose collective income is equal to more than 50%, but does not exceed 80%, of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located."Middle-income household." A single individual, family or unrelated individuals living together whose collective income is equal to more than 80%, but less than 120%, of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located."Very low-income household." A single individual, family or unrelated individuals living together whose collective income does not exceed 50% of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0841PN0871 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829